Montana, session 2025, HB497.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MONTANA:
Section 1. Section 37-68-305, MCA, is amended to read:
"37-68-305. Journeyman and residential electricians -- application -- qualifications -- contents
of examination. (1) An applicant for a journeyman electrician's license shall furnish written evidence of at least
one of the following:
(a) completion of an approved apprenticeship program under Title 39, chapter 6, or a substantially
equivalent program in the electrical trade;
(b) completion of an appropriate training program conducted by a bona fide union or trade
association;
(c)(b) 8,000 hours of legally obtained practical experience in the wiring for, installing, and repairing of
electrical apparatus and equipment for light, heat, and power; or
(d)(c) work in the electrical maintenance field for at least 20,000 hours, accompanied by written
certification by the applicant's employer that the employer considers the applicant qualified to take the
examination for which the applicant is applying and that the applicant has attained at least 20,000 hours in the
electrical maintenance field while working for the employer. A minimum of 8,000 of these hours must be
practical experience.
(2) Applications for license and notice to the applicant must be made and given in the same
manner as for master electricians' licenses. The examination for a journeyman's license must consist of at least
- 1 - Authorized Print Version – HB 497
ENROLLED BILL

****
69th Legislature 2025 HB 497
60 questions designed to fairly test the applicant's knowledge and the applicant's technical application skills in
the following subjects:
(a) the national electric code; and
(b) board rules and applicable laws under Title 37.
(3) An applicant for a residential electrician's license shall furnish written evidence of at least one
of the following:
(a) completion of an approved residential electrician apprenticeship program under Title 39,
chapter 6, or a substantially equivalent program;
(b) 4,000 hours of legally obtained practical experience in the wiring for, installing, and repairing of
electrical apparatus and equipment for light, heat, and power in residential construction consisting of less than
five living units in a single structure;
(c) completion of an appropriate training program conducted by a bona fide union or trade
association; or
(d)(c) work in the electrical maintenance field for at least 20,000 hours, accompanied by written
certification by the applicant's employer that the employer considers the applicant qualified to take the
examination for which the applicant is applying and that the applicant has attained at least 20,000 hours in the
electrical maintenance field while working for the employer. A minimum of 8,000 of these hours must be
practical experience.
(4) Application for license and notice to the applicant must be made and given in the same manner
as for master electricians' licenses. The examination for a residential electrician's license must consist of at
least 50 questions designed to fairly test the applicant's knowledge and the applicant's technical application
skills in the following subjects:
(a) the national electric code; and
(b) board rules and applicable laws under Title 37.
(5) (a) For the purposes of this section, the following terms apply:
(a) (i) "electrical Electrical maintenance" means the ordinary and customary installations in a plant
or onsite in addition to modifications, additions, or repairs that are limited to replacing ballasts, relamping,
trouble-shooting motor controls, and replacing motors, breakers, or magnetic starters in a kind-for-kind manner.
- 2 - Authorized Print Version – HB 497
ENROLLED BILL

****
69th Legislature 2025 HB 497
The term includes the connection of specific items of specialized equipment that can be directly connected to
an existing branch circuit panel by means of factory-installed leads.
(b)(ii) The term does not include installation of a new circuit to operate the equipment described in
subsection (5)(a)(i) or installation that requires the size of supply conductors to be increased.
(b) (i) "Legally obtained practical experience" means experience obtained in accordance with the
laws and rules of the jurisdiction in which an applicant obtained the experience and within the applicable laws
pertaining to the state electrical board.
(ii) The term does not include experience obtained during an apprenticeship that was not
completed."
Section 2. Effective date. [This act] is effective on passage and approval.
- END -
- 3 - Authorized Print Version – HB 497
ENROLLED BILL

I hereby certify that the within bill,
HB 497, originated in the House.
___________________________________________
Chief Clerk of the House
___________________________________________
Speaker of the House
Signed this _______________________________day
of____________________________________, 2025.
___________________________________________
President of the Senate
Signed this _______________________________day
of____________________________________, 2025.

HOUSE BILL NO. 497
INTRODUCED BY J. LYNCH, E. BUTTREY
AN ACT REVISING LAWS RELATING TO APPRENTICESHIP PROGRAMS IN THE ELECTRICAL TRADE;
ALLOWING FOR COMPLETION OF AN APPROVED APPRENTICESHIP PROGRAM OR A SUBSTANTIAL
EQUIVALENT PROGRAM IN THE ELECTRICAL TRADE; PROVIDING A DEFINITION; AMENDING SECTION
37-68-305, MCA; AND PROVIDING AN IMMEDIATE EFFECTIVE DATE.”